src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv36_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: støð
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: støð
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: støð
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: støðar
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: støðir
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: støðum
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: støða
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: støðin
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: støðna
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: støðni
    støð+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: støðarinnar
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: støðirnar
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: støðunum
    støð+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: støðanna
